District of Columbia statutes.
47-4438

Priority.

The offset of a tax refund against the delinquent taxes for which a taxpayer is liable shall have priority over the offset of a tax refund requested by the United States.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 405(b), 48 DCR 334